Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB546.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 106. Residential Rental Property Rate Increases.--(a) A lessor of a residential rental property of a tenant may not increase the gross rental amount for the residential rental property of the tenant by an amount greater than ten per cent above the lowest gross rental amount charged for the residential rental property at any time during the twelve-month period prior to the effective date of the increase in the gross rental amount or by a rate greater than the percentage increase in the annual 1234567891011121314151617181920 area median income of the county in which the residential rental property is located, whichever is greater. The following apply:(1) In determining the lowest gross rental amount, any rent discount, incentive, concession or credit offered by the lessor and accepted by the tenant shall be excluded.(2) The gross rental amount and any rent discount, incentive, concession or credit shall be separately listed and identified in the rental agreement, and in any amendment of the rental agreement, of the tenant.(3) If the same tenant remains in occupancy of a residential rental property over any twelve-month period, the lessor may not increase the gross rental amount more than once during that twelve-month period unless stipulated in the rental agreement.(b) The following apply to notice of an increase in the gross rental amount for a tenant by a lessor:(1) The lessor shall provide the tenant with written notice of the increase at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the increase.(2) The written notice of the increase must specify all of the following:(i) The amount of the increase.(ii) The new gross rental amount.(iii) The facts supporting an exception authorized under subsection (h) for any increase exceeding the limitations under subsection (a), if applicable.(iv) The date on which the increase becomes effective.(c) A lessor may not increase the gross rental amount for a new tenant more than fifteen per cent above the gross rental amount paid by the tenant who occupied the residential rental property immediately prior to the occupancy of the new tenant. 20250SB0546PN0571 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The lessor shall disclose the gross rental amount paid by the previous tenant to the new tenant before or at the time of the execution of the rental agreement by the new tenant.(d) A lessor that increases gross rental amounts in violation of this section is liable to the tenant in an amount equal to three months' rent of the tenant plus actual damages suffered by the tenant.(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or impair the right of a tenant to pursue a private cause of action or seek other relief.(f) The Rent Control Advisory Board is established to administer this section. The following apply:(1) The appointment of members of the board shall be as follows:(i) The Governor shall appoint as a member of the board an individual representing tenants.(ii) The President pro tempore of the Senate shall appoint the following as members of the board:(A) An individual representing the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.(B) An individual representing recipients of low-income housing.(iii) The Minority Leader of the Senate shall appoint the following as members of the board:(A) An individual representing developers.(B) An individual representing persons with disabilities.(iv) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint the following as members of the board:(A) An individual representing the building or construction trades.20250SB0546PN0571 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) An individual representing the Housing Alliance of Pennsylvania.(v) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives shall appoint the following as members of the board:(A) An individual representing the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.(B) An individual representing lessors.(2) The members of the board shall be appointed as follows:(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), members of the board shall be appointed for a term of three years and may be reappointed.(ii) Members of the board first appointed shall be appointed for staggered terms so that the terms of no more than four members shall expire at the same time thereafter. The following apply:(A) The members of the board listed in paragraph (1)(i) shall initially be appointed for a one-year term.(B) The members of the board listed in paragraph (1)(ii) and (iii) shall initially be appointed for a two-year term.(C) The members of the board listed in paragraph (1)(iv) and (v) shall initially be appointed for a three-year term.(3) The m embers of the board shall serve without pay. (4) A vacancy on the board that occurs other than by the expiration of the term of the board member shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.(5) T he appointing authority may remove any of its members of the board for misconduct or malfeasance in office, incapacity or neglect of duty.(6) A member of the board must be a resident of this 20250SB0546PN0571 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.(7) The board shall meet at least every six months to discuss the effects of the measures under this section as they relate to lessors, tenants, residential rental property and other related matters.(8) The members of the board shall choose a chairperson and vice chairperson of the board.(9) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum to conduct the official business of the board.(10 ) The Office of the Governor shall ensure that reasonable staff and support are made available to the board to carry out its duties.(11) The following apply to reports:(i) No later than one year after the effective date of this section and annually thereafter, the board shall issue a report of its findings and recommendations regarding the e ffects of the measures under this section as they relate to lessors, tenants, residential rental property and other related matters.(ii) Each report under this paragraph shall be submitted to:(A) The Governor.(B) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(C) The Minority Leader of the Senate.(D) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(E) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(F) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate.(G) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives.(12) On an annual basis, the board shall ascertain the area 20250SB0546PN0571 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 median income and the percentage increase in the area median income for each county in this Commonwealth and shall transmit that information to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(g) A lessor may evict a tenant from a residential rental property only for good cause.(h) A lessor may file an action with the magisterial district judge with jurisdiction over the location in which the residential rental property is located to appeal the prohibition under subsection (a) or (c). The following apply:(1) The appeal must be based on financial hardship that:(i) is caused by the prohibition;(ii) is caused through no fault of the lessor; and(iii) constitutes severe or irreparable economic or financial burden on the part of the lessor and not merely the lack of profitability.(2) The remedy sought under the appeal regarding subsection (a) shall constitute a one-time exemption from the prohibition under subsection (a), with the new cap not to exceed twenty per cent of the amount specified under subsection (a).(3) The remedy sought under the appeal regarding subsection (b) shall be an upward adjustment of the gross rental amount not to exceed fifteen per cent.(i) This section does not apply in any of the following cases:(1) The residential rental property has been newly constructed and issued a certificate of occupancy as a result of its completion, less than ten years from the effective date of the increase in the gross rental amount.20250SB0546PN0571 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The residential rental property is regulated or certified as affordable housing by a Federal, State or local government and the change in rent:(i) does not increase the tenant's portion of the rent; or(ii) is required by program eligibility requirements or by a change in the tenant's income.(3) Except as provided in subsection (c), the lessor is entering into a new rental agreement in which no tenant from the prior rental agreement remains in lawful possession of the residential rental property. In such a case, the following apply:(i) Subsection (a) shall not apply to the establishment by the lessor of the initial gross rental amount of the residential rental property.(ii) Subsection (a) shall apply to any subsequent increase in the gross rental amount after the establishment of the initial gross rental amount under this subsection.(4) The residential rental property is the subject of a countywide revision of reassessment regarding real property taxes during the period of the rental agreement.(5) The lessor is a small landlord.(6) The residential rental property is a dormitory.(j) This section shall not apply on or after the date that is fifteen years after the effective date of this subsection.(k) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Area median income." The midpoint of a specific area's household income distribution, as calculated on an annual basis by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.20250SB0546PN0571 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Board." The Rent Control Advisory Board established under subsection (f)."Dormitory." A building constructed and maintained in connection with an institution of higher education for the use and occupancy of students in attendance at the institution of higher education."Good cause." Any of the following:(1) Failure of the tenant to pay the gross rental amount.(2) Violation by the tenant of a material term of the rental agreement, after being given a written notice to correct the violation.(3) Criminal activity by the tenant on the residential rental property, including any common area, or criminal activity or criminal threat on or off the residential rental property that is directed at the lessor or an agent of the lessor.(4) Failure of the tenant to vacate the residential rental property after the termination of the rental agreement or the end of the rental period under the rental agreement."Gross rental amount." As follows:(1) The monthly amount of money paid by a tenant for rent for a residential rental property, as specified in the rental agreement of the tenant.(2) The term does not include fees, penalties or the costs of utilities for the residential rental property."Institution of higher education." As defined in section 118(c) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."Lessor." A person, who is a landlord, with an ownership stake in owning, controlling, leasing, operating or managing a residential rental property of a tenant.20250SB0546PN0571 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Rental agreement." As follows:(1) A contract or other agreement under which a lessor allows a tenant to use and occupy a residential rental property.(2) The term includes a lease or sublease."Residential rental property." A dwelling, or unit within a dwelling, that is used or intended to be used as a place of human habitation and is the subject of a rental agreement."Small landlord." A lessor, who is a landlord, with an ownership stake in owning, controlling, leasing, operating or managing fewer than fifteen units in a residential rental property or in multiple residential rental properties."Tenant." An individual who lawfully occupies or intends to lawfully occupy a residential rental property.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0546PN0571 - 9 - 1234567891011121314